Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-484.07
Operators' licenses; state identification cards; parolee immigration status; effect on application and issuance.

(1) On a date determined by the director but not later than November 1, 2023, any person assigned a parolee immigration status by the United States Department of Homeland Security may apply for and be issued an operator's license or a state identification card that is not in compliance with the federal REAL ID Act of 2005, Public Law 109-13, if the person:

(a) Possessed an unexpired foreign passport issued to such person at the time of such person's entry into the United States of America; and

(b) Fulfills the requirements of subsection (3) of section 60-484 and such requirements are verified pursuant to section 60-484.06.

(2) Any operator's license or state identification card issued under this section is otherwise subject to all laws relating to operators' licenses and state identification cards.

Laws 2023, LB138, § 20.